Vermont statutes. Title 33 Human Services
Subchapter 3. Health Care Services

§ 7151.
Advanced practice registered nurse; scope of practice.

Except to the extent prohibited under federal law for purposes of federal financial participation, a nursing home shall permit a licensed advanced practice registered nurse providing services at the nursing home to perform all services within the advanced practice registered nurse’s scope of practice, including:

when providing primary care services, serving as the primary care provider of record;

performing acts of medical diagnosis, including ordering and interpreting diagnostic tests and procedures;

prescribing medications;

prescribing medical, therapeutic, and corrective measures;

initiating written and verbal orders to other health care providers; and

managing and evaluating care.

HISTORY:

Added

2017, No. 48

, § 34, eff. May 23, 2017.